Tennessee, session 114, HB2523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Maternal Health Care
Protection Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-903(a), is amended by deleting
"and" at the end of subdivision (a)(2)(A), deleting the period at the end of subdivision (a)(2)(B),
and substituting instead a semicolon, and adding the following as new subdivisions:
(C) Does not permit a healthcare provider to refuse to participate in or pay for
pregnancy-related healthcare procedures, treatments, or services that are within the
scope of the healthcare provider's license and professional obligations; and
(D) Does not permit a healthcare institution or healthcare payer to adopt or
enforce a policy, guideline, or contractual provision that results in the denial of
pregnancy-related healthcare procedures, treatments, or services based on the exercise
of the right described in this subsection (a).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-902, is amended by adding the
following as new, appropriately designated subdivisions:
( ) "Pregnancy-related healthcare procedures, treatments, or services":
(A) Means healthcare procedures, treatments, or services provided to a
pregnant patient; and
(B) Includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Emergency medical care;
HB2523
012735
- 1 -

(ii) Diagnosis, monitoring, and treatment of pregnancy-related
conditions or complications;
(iii) Care necessary to prevent serious risk to the pregnant
patient's life or health; and
(iv) Standard obstetric, gynecological, prenatal, perinatal, and
postpartum care;
( ) "Pregnant patient" means an individual who is pregnant or who is reasonably
believed to be pregnant, regardless of gestational age or pregnancy outcome;
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012735